Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 6. Granite Reservoir, Crystal Reservoir and Upper North Crow Reservoir Areas

§ 36-8-601.
Declaration of Curt Gowdy state park.

The lands in Laramie and Albany counties managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 at Granite Reservoir, Crystal Reservoir and Upper North Crow Reservoir areas known collectively as Curt Gowdy state park are hereby declared to be a state park. The department shall by rule specify the legal description of the state park.

through (v) Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 3.

The state park shall be known as the Curt Gowdy state park.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 32, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-180.16; Laws 1973, ch. 31, § 1; 2006, ch. 3, § 1; 2010, ch. 11, §§ 2, 3.

The 2006 amendment,

rewrote the section by adding the introductory language of (a); adding designations (a)(i) through (iv).

Laws 2006, ch. 3, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2006.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a) substituted “managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 at” for “known as the,” substituted “known collectively as Curt Gowdy state park” for “described as follows,” added the last sentence; and repealed former (a)(i) through (a)(v) pertaining to statutory legal descriptions.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 180, § 1, provides: “There is appropriated nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000.00) from the general fund to the department of state parks and cultural resources which shall only be used to match dollar for dollar any private donations received by the department for the construction of a visitor's center at Curt Gowdy state park. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on July 1, 2013. This appropriation shall not be included in the department's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request.”

§ 36-8-602.
Administration.

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall administer this area.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 32, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-180.17; Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.